Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.270

Notice—Response—Failure to respond, appear, pay penalties, or register.

(1) A contractor who is issued a notice of infraction shall respond within thirty days of the date of issuance of the notice of infraction.

(2) If the contractor named in the notice of infraction does not elect to contest the notice of infraction, then the contractor shall pay to the department, by check or money order, the amount of the penalty prescribed for the infraction. When a response which does not contest the notice of infraction is received by the department with the appropriate penalty, the department shall make the appropriate entry in its records.

(3) If the contractor named in the notice of infraction elects to contest the notice of infraction, the contractor shall respond by filing an appeal to the department in the manner specified in RCW 18.27.250.

(4) If any contractor issued a notice of infraction fails to respond within the prescribed response period, the contractor shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurred.

(5) After final determination by an administrative law judge that an infraction has been committed, a contractor who fails to pay a monetary penalty within thirty days, that is not waived pursuant to RCW 18.27.340(2), and who fails to file an appeal pursuant to RCW 18.27.310(4), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurred.

(6) A contractor who fails to pay a monetary penalty within thirty days after exhausting appellate remedies pursuant to RCW 18.27.310(4), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurred.

(7) If a contractor who is issued a notice of infraction is a contractor who has failed to register as a contractor under this chapter, the contractor is subject to a monetary penalty per infraction as provided in the schedule of penalties established by the department, and each day the person works without becoming registered is a separate infraction.

[ 2011 c 15 s 2; 2007 c 436 s 15; 2000 c 171 s 9; 1997 c 314 s 16; 1986 c 197 s 6; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.